District of Columbia statutes.
3-1209.12

Phlebotomist.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “phlebotomist” means an unlicensed person trained in the proper procedure for withdrawing blood by venipuncture or skin puncture for clinical laboratory test purposes.

(b)

A person who is engaged as a phlebotomist in the District of Columbia shall register with the Mayor, renew the registration as required by rule, and pay the required registration fee established by the Mayor.

(c)

Any person registered to practice as a phlebotomist shall work under the general supervision of a licensed physician, advanced practice nurse, or other licensed health professional as the Mayor determines by rule.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 912
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-272, § 2(g), 62 DCR 1911